District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.24

Quorum and voting.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, a quorum of the board of directors shall consist of a majority of the directors in office before a meeting begins.

(b)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may authorize a quorum of the board of directors to consist of no fewer than the greater of 1/3 of the number of directors in office or 2 directors.

(c)

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present shall be the act of the board of directors unless a greater vote is required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(d)

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken shall be considered to have assented to the action taken unless one of the following applies:

(1)

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon arrival, to holding it or transacting at the meeting; or

(2)

The director dissents or abstains from the action and:

(A)

The dissent or abstention is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

(B)

The director delivers notice in the form of a record of the director’s dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the corporation promptly after adjournment of the meeting.

(e)

The right of dissent or abstention shall not be available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-401.50, § 29-406.25, and § 29-406.53.